Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB830.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Child-Care Workforce Report and Commission Act.Section 2. Declaration of purpose.The General Assembly finds and declares that there is a need to collect and analyze reliable, consistent and transparent data about the child-care workforce in this Commonwealth, including the size of the child-care workforce and the level of education and credentials, race, ethnicity, gender, length of service and compensation of the child-care workforce.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 12345678910111213141516171819 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Child care." The supervision of children who are younger than 16 years of age and who are away from the home that is provided in lieu of parental supervision for part of the 24-hour day. The term does not include the supervision of children provided in a place of worship during religious services or by a social service organization."Child-care center." A premises certified by the department where care is provided at any one time for seven or more children unrelated to the operator of the premises."Child-care employee." An individual who provides child care in a child-care center, family child-care home or group child-care home."Child-care workforce." Child-care employees and child-care providers."Commission." The Child-Care Workforce Commission established under section 4."Department." The Department of Human Services of the Commonwealth."Family child-care home." A residential facility, certified by the department, where child care is provided by the occupier of the premises to no fewer than four children and no more than six children at any one time who are not relatives of the provider."Group child-care home." A premises, including a residential facility, certified by the department, where care is provided at any one time to no fewer than six children and no more than 16 older school-age-level children, or no fewer than six children and no more than 13 children of another age level, who are unrelated to the operator of the premises.20250SB0830PN0898 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Institution of higher education." Any of the following:(1) A community college operating under Article XIX-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(2) A university within the State System of Higher Education.(3) The Pennsylvania State University, the University of Pittsburgh, Temple University, Lincoln University or any other institution designated as State-related by the Commonwealth.(4) A college established under Article XIX-G of the Public School Code of 1949.(5) An institution of higher education located in and incorporated or chartered by the Commonwealth and entitled to confer degrees as specified in 24 Pa.C.S. § 6505 (relating to power to confer degrees) and as provided for by the standards and qualifications prescribed by the State Board of Education under 24 Pa.C.S. Ch. 65 (relating to private colleges, universities and seminaries)."Office." The Office of Child Development and Early Learning within the department and the Department of Education."Registry." The Pennsylvania Professional Development Registry maintained by the office."Secretary." The Secretary of Human Services of the Commonwealth."STAR level." The numeric indicator assigned by the office for each child-care center, family child-care home and group child-care home in accordance with Pennsylvania's quality rating improvement system.Section 4. Establishment of commission.20250SB0830PN0898 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The Child-Care Workforce Commission is established within the department. The department shall provide administrative support, meeting space and any other administrative assistance required by the commission in the conduct of the commission's work.Section 5. Duties of commission.(a) Review and analysis.--The commission shall review and analyze child-care workforce data for the purpose of issuing recommendations based on the data in a report under section 9.(b) Additional duties.--For the purposes of this act, the commission:(1) Shall review, make findings and offer recommendations related to the child-care workforce in this Commonwealth.(2) Shall conduct meetings in accordance with the requirements under section 7.(3) May solicit and collect written comments via the publicly accessible Internet website under section 8(a).(4) May share reports, meeting minutes, testimony and other meeting-related documents and meeting schedules via the publicly accessible Internet website under section 8(a).Section 6. Composition of commission.(a) Composition.--The commission shall consist of the following members:(1) The secretary or a designee.(2) The deputy secretary of the office or a designee.(3) The Secretary of Education or a designee.(4) The Secretary of Labor and Industry or a designee.(5) An individual appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate.(6) An individual appointed by the Speaker of the House 20250SB0830PN0898 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of Representatives.(7) An individual appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.(8) An individual appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(9) Eleven individuals appointed by the Governor within 60 days of the effective date of this paragraph and confirmed by the Senate, including all of the following:(i) One individual representing an owner or operator of a child-care center with multiple locations.(ii) One individual representing an owner or operator of a child-care center with a single location.(iii) One individual representing a nonprofit professional association of child-care employees.(iv) One individual representing a nonprofit organization experienced in the analysis of economic and labor data.(v) One individual who is a child-care employee in a rural area.(vi) One individual who is a child-care employee in an urban area.(vii) One individual who provides child care in a family child-care home.(viii) One individual who teaches early childhood education in an institution of higher education.(ix) One parent of a child who receives child care in a rural area.(x) One parent of a child who receives child care in an urban area.(xi) One individual representing an organization 20250SB0830PN0898 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that represents child-care providers.(b) Chairperson.--The Governor shall appoint a member to serve as chairperson of the commission.(c) Consideration of appointees.--In making the appointments to the commission, the Governor shall consider individuals who reflect the population of the Commonwealth pursuant to the most recent American Community Survey conducted by the United States Census Bureau.(d) Terms of office.--Members of the commission shall serve terms as follows:(1) Members of the commission appointed under subsection (a)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7) and (8) shall serve a term consistent with their offices or the offices of the members of the General Assembly who appointed the members.(2) Members of the commission appointed under subsection (a)(9) shall serve terms as follows:(i) For the initial appointment, six members shall serve a four-year term and five members shall serve a three-year term.(ii) For subsequent appointments, members shall serve a three-year term.(iii) Members appointed under subsection (a)(9) may not serve more than two terms.Section 7. Meetings and compensation of commission.(a) Conduct of meetings.--The commission shall conduct each meeting of the commission in accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. § 704 (relating to open meetings). The commission shall live stream each meeting or hearing of the commission.(b) Initial meeting.--The commission shall conduct an initial meeting no later than 60 days after the appointment of 20250SB0830PN0898 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 all members of the commission under section 6(a).(c) Frequency of meetings.--(1) The commission shall conduct at least four meetings annually.(2) In addition to regularly scheduled meetings under paragraph (1), the commission may conduct additional meetings as requested by a simple majority of the members of the commission or subject to the call of the chairperson.(d) Notice of meetings.--The commission shall provide notice of each meeting of the commission in accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. § 709 (relating to public notice) and post the notice on the publicly accessible Internet website under section 8(a).(e) Public hearings.--(1) The commission shall conduct three public hearings no later than 180 days from the date of the initial meeting under subsection (b).(2) The commission and office shall develop a system for receiving written comments from the public, including through all electronic mail formats and on a public comment portal on the publicly accessible Internet website under section 8(a). The commission shall review comments submitted during each meeting of the commission and give equal consideration to in-person testimony.(3) The commission may request data from the registry and the Department of Labor and Industry for the purpose of providing guidance, preparing reports and making recommendations to the office, department, the General Assembly and the Governor.(f) Compensation and expenses.--Members of the commission shall not receive a salary or per diem allowance for serving on 20250SB0830PN0898 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the commission, but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses, including the cost of travel, incurred in the performance of their duties.Section 8. Public portal and Internet website of commission.(a) Establishment.--The office shall establish a publicly accessible Internet website for use by the commission.(b) Contents of website.--The website must include the following:(1) The annual child-care workforce report under section 9(a).(2) A public comment portal that is able to facilitate real-time written comments during each meeting or hearing of the commission.(3) A hyperlink to the registry.(4) Access to each meeting or hearing of the commission.(5) A video archive of each meeting or hearing of the commission.(6) The agendas, minutes, testimony, reports and any other documentation of each meeting or hearing of the commission that is not exempt from public access under section 708 of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(7) Notice of each meeting or hearing of the commission.(8) The names and affiliations of the members of the commission.Section 9. Data and annual child-care workforce report.(a) Collection and compilation of data.--(1) The office, in collaboration with the Department of Labor and Industry, shall annually collect and compile a sample of the following data from the child-care workforce 20250SB0830PN0898 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 via the registry:(i) The demographic data of each child-care employee, including age, ethnicity, race and gender.(ii) The professional trainings completed by each child-care employee.(iii) The academic credentials held by each child-care employee.(iv) The compensation, including salary and benefits, of each child-care employee.(v) The job title of each child-care employee.(vi) The age of children being served by each child-care employee.(vii) The name of each child-care provider or child-care provider number.(viii) Any other data the office deems necessary to complete the report under subsection (b).(2) The office, in collaboration with the Department of Labor and Industry, shall collect and compile the following data and organize the data by county, by labor market area and by STAR level and the age of children receiving child care:(i) Descriptive child-care workforce data, including gender, race, ethnicity, education and other professional credentials.(ii) The minimum, maximum and average yearly salary for child-care employees by gender, race, ethnicity, education and other professional credentials as delineated by job title.(iii) The minimum, maximum and average length of employment for child-care employees with a specific 20250SB0830PN0898 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 child-care provider.(iv) Benefits data, including the percentage of the child-care employees that receive employer-provided health insurance, retirement benefits, sign-on bonuses, retention bonuses and performance-related bonuses to the extent that this data is available and as delineated by job title.(v) Any observed changes or trends in the data in the report over a period of time, if data for the prior year is available.(vi) A summary of the generalized findings of the report, including the sample size obtained in the data in the report.(b) Issuance and contents of report.--No later than six months following the effective date of this subsection, the office shall issue an initial report that includes the data compiled under subsection (a) and any recommendations.(c) Updates.--No later than October 31 following the initial report under subsection (b) and each October 31 thereafter, the office shall update the data and recommendations and issue an annual report containing the updated data.(d) Public accessibility.--The office shall ensure that each report under this section is posted on the publicly accessible Internet websites for the commission under section 8(a), the office, the department and the Department of Education.(e) Recipients of report.--The office shall provide copies of each report under this section to the following:(1) The Governor.(2) The Aging and Youth Committee of the Senate.(3) The Children and Youth Committee of the House of 20250SB0830PN0898 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Representatives.(4) The Education Committee of the Senate.(5) The Education Committee of the House of Representatives.(6) The Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(7) The Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.(8) The Labor and Industry Committee of the Senate.(9) The Labor and Industry Committee of the House of Representatives.(10) Any other standing committee of the General Assembly deemed necessary to implement the commission's recommendations made in a report under this section.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250SB0830PN0898 - 11 - 12345678910111213141516